Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2335.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Sections 2(1) and (17) and 8.9 of the act of May 22, 1951 (P.L.317, No.69), known as The Professional Nursing Law, are amended to read:Section 2. Definitions.--When used in this act, the following words and phrases shall have the following meanings unless the context provides otherwise:(1) The "Practice of Professional Nursing" means diagnosing and treating human responses to actual or potential health problems through such services as casefinding, health teaching, 1234567891011121314151617181920 health counseling, and provision of care supportive to or restorative of life and well-being, and executing medical regimens as prescribed by a licensed physician or dentist. The foregoing shall not be deemed to include acts of medical diagnosis or prescription of medical therapeutic or corrective measures, except as performed by a certified registered nurse practitioner or certified registered nurse anesthetist acting in accordance with rules and regulations promulgated by the Board.* * *[(17) "Overall direction" means oversight of anesthesia services and medical management of patient care by a qualified individual who is present and available onsite, but not necessarily present in the same procedure room as a certified registered nurse anesthetist performing anesthesia services for the duration of the services provided.]Section 8.9. Scope of Practice for Certified Registered Nurse Anesthetists.--(a) A certified registered nurse anesthetist shall have the authority to perform anesthesia services in cooperation with a physician, podiatrist or dentist involved in a procedure for which anesthesia care is being [provided if the anesthesia services are performed under the overall direction of any of the following:(1) A physician licensed by the State Board of Medicine or the State Board of Osteopathic Medicine who has completed an accredited residency training program in anesthesiology.(2) A physician licensed by the State Board of Medicine or the State Board of Osteopathic Medicine who is performing the procedure for which the certified registered nurse anesthetist is performing anesthesia services.(3) A podiatrist licensed by the State Board of Podiatry who 20260HB2335PN3109 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 is performing the procedure for which the certified registered nurse anesthetist is performing anesthesia services.(4) A dentist licensed by the State Board of Dentistry and permitted by the act of May 1, 1933 (P.L.216, No.76), known as "The Dental Law," or the State Board of Dentistry to administer, supervise or direct the administration of anesthesia.] provided.(a.1) Anesthesia services include the authority to prescribe, dispense and administer prescription drugs, including prescriptions for controlled substances listed in Schedules II, III, IV and V under 21 U.S.C. § 812 (relating to schedules of controlled substances); to order and evaluate laboratory and diagnostic test results and perform point-of-care testing that the certified registered nurse anesthetist is qualified to perform; and to order and evaluate radiographic imaging studies that the certified registered nurse anesthetist is qualified to order and interpret. A certified registered nurse anesthetist may prescribe prescription drugs for a supply of not more than ten (10) days with no refills and only for an individual for whom the certified registered nurse anesthetist has, at the time of the prescription, established a client or patient record.(a.2) Nothing in this section requires a certified registered nurse anesthetist to obtain prescriptive authority from a physician, podiatrist or dentist to select, order and administer controlled substances in connection with the procedure for which anesthesia care is being provided.(a.3) A certified registered nurse anesthetist may perform the following services and procedures:(1) be responsible for performing and documenting total anesthesia care of a patient, including, but not limited to, preanesthetic preparation and evaluation, requesting 20260HB2335PN3109 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 consultations and diagnostic studies, obtaining informed consent for anesthesia and selection and administration of anesthetic agents or other agents administered in the management of anesthetic care, anesthesia induction, maintenance, emergence and post anesthesia care;(2) develop and implement an anesthetic care plan;(3) select and initiate the planned anesthesia technique which may include general, regional and local anesthesia and sedation;(4) select, apply or insert appropriate noninvasive and invasive monitoring modalities for collecting and interpreting patient physiological data;(5) support life functions during the perioperative period;(6) select, obtain and administer the anesthetics, adjuvant drugs, accessory drugs and fluids necessary to manage the anesthetic to maintain the patient's physiologic homeostasis, and to correct abnormal responses to the anesthesia or surgery;(7) recognize and be able to take appropriate action for untoward patient responses during anesthesia;(8) observe and manage the patient's emergence from anesthesia by selecting, obtaining, ordering or administering medications, fluids or ventilatory support in order to maintain homeostasis;(9) discharge patients from a postanesthesia care area;(10) participate in the life support of the patient, including, but not limited to, perianesthetic and clinical support functions;(11) implement acute and chronic pain management modalities;(12) respond to emergency situations by providing airway management, administration of emergency fluids or drugs, or 20260HB2335PN3109 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 using basic or advanced cardiac life support techniques;(13) supervise anesthesia care being provided by nurse trainees enrolled in a course approved by the Council on Accreditation of Nurse Anesthesia Educational Programs; and(14) direct administration of anesthesia by a graduate of an approved anesthesia program until the announcement of results of the first examination given for certification for which the graduate is eligible.(b) Nothing in this section shall be construed to:[(1) prohibit a certified registered nurse anesthetist who would otherwise require direction from providing brief periods of care in the event of an emergency that temporarily prevents or interferes with overall direction;](2) restrict the authority of a health care facility to provide for additional oversight requirements for a certified registered nurse anesthetist practicing within the facility; or(3) limit or prohibit a certified registered nurse anesthetist from engaging in those activities which normally constitute the practice of professional nursing as defined in section 2.(c) For purposes of this section, a licensed physician, licensed podiatrist or licensed dentist is not liable for any act or omission of a certified registered nurse anesthetist who orders or administers anesthetics.(d) As used in this section, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Cooperation" means a process in which the certified registered nurse anesthetist and the physician, dentist or podiatrist work together with each contributing an area of 20260HB2335PN3109 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 expertise, at their individual and respective levels of education and training.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20260HB2335PN3109 - 6 - 123